Arkansas, session 2025, SB502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 9, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-921. Filing of form 1099.
(a) A taxpayer that is subject to the withholding requirements of this
subchapter shall file with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration each Internal Revenue Service form 1099 on which the taxpayer
is the payer.
(b) A form 1099 required to be filed under subsection (a) of this
section shall be filed with the secretary:
(1) On or before January 31 following the close of the income
year in which the form 1099 was issued; and
(2) Electronically, if the payer of the form 1099 files with the
secretary at least one thousand (1,000) form 1099s during the payer's income
year.
*JLL316*
03/18/2025 1:18:00 PM JLL316

SB502

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

































03/18/2025 1:18:00 PM JLL316